Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB301.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.500 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) At the close of each fiscal year, the retirement system shall add service credit
to the account of each member who made contributions to his or her account
during the year.
(b) Nonuniversity members are entitled to a full year of service credit if they have
no more than five (5) unpaid days in a school or fiscal year under a contract
requiring a work schedule of one hundred eighty-five (185) days or greater.
(c) University members are entitled to a full year of service credit if they have no
more than five (5) unpaid days in a school or fiscal year under a contract
requiring a work schedule of one hundred eighty (180) days or greater.
(d) 1. A member who has more than the allowed number of unpaid days as
specified in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection shall be allowed to
recover up to a maximum of ten (10) unpaid days if the days were
missed for the observance of religious holidays and the member
submits a personal statement verifying the unpaid days were for the
observance of religious holidays.
2. The number of days recovered shall be included in the number of days
worked for service credit purposes.
3. The employer of a member recovering unpaid days under this
paragraph shall assign duties and responsibilities for recovered days
comparable to the duties and responsibilities of the member on a
typical contract day.
(e) In the event a member is paid for less than the required number of days for a
full year of service credit, the member may purchase credit according to
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 339
administrative regulations established by the board of trustees.
(f) In no case shall more than one (1) year of service be credited for all service
performed in one (1) fiscal year.
(g) Members who complete their employment contract prior to the close of a
fiscal year and elect to retire prior to the close of a fiscal year shall have their
service credit reduced by eight percent (8%) for each calendar month that the
retirement becomes effective prior to July 1.
(2) Members who are employed and paid for less than the number of days required in
their normal employment year shall be entitled to pro rata service credit for the
fractional service. Such credit shall be based upon the number of days employed
and the number of days in the member's annual employment agreement or normal
employment year.
(3) Service credit may not exceed the ratio between the school or fiscal year and the
number of months or fraction of a month the member is employed during that year.
(4) No service credit shall be granted in the Teachers' Retirement System for service
that has been or will be used in qualifying for annuity benefit payments from
another retirement system financed wholly or in part by public funds.
Section 2. Whereas the General Assembly wants to acknowledge the diverse
religions of the teachers employed in the Commonwealth and allow teachers to observe
the holidays of their religions, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect
upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:28 PM Jacketed